createYaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_magad.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: atemagad
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: atemagadoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: atemagadini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: atemagadiniwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: atemagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: atemagasinoon
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: atemagasinini
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: atemagasininiwan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: atemagadooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [atemagadoobaniin,atemagadoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: atemagadiniiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [atemagadiniibaniin,atemagadiniibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: atemagasinooban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [atemagasinoobaniin,atemagasinoobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: atemagasininiiban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [atemagasininiibaniin,atemagasininiibanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: atemagadodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: atemagadodogenan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: atemagadiniwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: atemagadiniwidogenan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: atemagasinodog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: atemagasinodogen
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: atemagasininiwidog
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: atemagasininiwidogenan
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: atemagadogoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [atemagadogobaniin,atemagadogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: atemagadinigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [atemagadinigobaniin,atemagadinigobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: atemagasinoogoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [atemagasinoogobaniin,atemagasinoogobanen]
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: atemagasininigoban
     atemagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [atemagasininigobaniin,atemagasininigobanen]
